California, session 20252026, AB2197.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6 (commencing with Section 44120) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 6. Solicitation44120. For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Business” means a provider of goods or services other than any of the following:(1) The state, a state agency, or a local educational agency.(2) A business contracted with the state, a state agency, or a local educational agency.(3) A business or other organization that conducts solicitation activity for the purpose of nonprofit fundraising. For purposes of this paragraph, “nonprofit” means an organization incorporated pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.(4) An employee, employee representative, or organization affiliated with the local educational agency or schoolsite.(b) “Employee” means a certificated or classified employee of a local educational agency.(c) “Financial service or product” means a service or product that is subject to the Financial Code or the Insurance Code.(d) “Inducement” means the offer or exchange of currency, goods, services, or other in-kind gifts that is intended or likely to lead to the recipient’s change in behavior to the benefit of the representative or business.(e) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(f) “Representative” means a natural person acting on behalf of a business for the purposes of solicitation.(g) “Schoolsite” means the physical location of a school in a local educational agency or of a resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility operated by a charter school.(h) “Solicitation” means the act of selling, offering for sale, or advertising for sale a financial service or product.44121. (a) A local educational agency shall not permit solicitation by a representative on a schoolsite to an employee or group of employees unless all of the following conditions are met:(1) The representative follows all security and safety measures required of visitors to the schoolsite.(2) The representative is not given access to areas of schoolsites in which pupils are regularly present.(3) Before solicitation, the representative provides verifiable evidence to the local educational agency demonstrating both of the following:(A) The representative’s status as an employee, agent, or owner of the business offering the financial service or product.(B) The representative is licensed, if required by law.(4) Solicitation is done in a location which is not regularly used for breaks by employees.(5) No resources of the local educational agency, including employee time or physical or electronic means of communication, are used to disseminate information for the solicitation.(b) A representative shall not provide any inducement to an employee before, or in the course of, solicitation under this section.(c) A representative shall, at the beginning and end of each solicitation under this section, do both of the following:(1) If any part of the representative’s total compensation is comprised of anything other than an hourly rate or salary, disclose verbally and in conspicuous writing the method by which the representative is compensated.(2) Provide written notice for any similar financial service or product that is available to an employee through the state or a public agency. The notice shall include all of the following:(A) The name of the similar financial service or product and, if applicable, the name of the public agency through which the service or product is available.(B) A statement conveying that the similar financial service or product may be offered at a total price that is in the employee’s best financial interest.(C) A statement that the representative and the business are not conducting solicitation on behalf of the state or a public agency.(d) A representative or business shall not engage in solicitation at a schoolsite while using graphics, colors, uniforms, or other articles of clothing that could reasonably be construed by an employee as representing a business or agency other than the actual business or agency being represented.(e) Any communication by a representative or business related to a solicitation under this section that is conducted through electronic mail shall include the word “VENDOR” or “SOLICITATION,” in all capital letters, at the beginning of the subject line of the electronic mail message.